zh-TW: 韭蔥品種: 美國旗; 迷你韭蔥; 班迪特; 藍索萊斯; 卡朗唐; 象蒜; 巨型馬瑟堡; 日本白蔥; 理查王; 蘭斯洛特; 林肯; 潘喬; 波貝拉; 義大利巨冬; 塔多納; 泰坦; 其他
sk-SK: Odroda póru: American Flag; Baby pór; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Iné
fi: Purjolajike: American Flag; Minipurjo; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Muu
fr: Variété de poireau: American Flag; Mini-poireau; Bandit; Bleu de Solaise; Carentan; Éléphant; Géant de Musselburgh; Shironegi japonais; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Autre
pl: Odmiana pora: American Flag; Baby Leek; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Słoniowy (Elephant); Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Inne
th: พันธุ์ต้นหอม: อเมริกันแฟล็ก; ต้นกระเทียมอ่อน; แบนดิต; บลูโซเลส; คาเรนตาน; เอเลเฟนท์; ไจแอนท์มัสเซิลเบิร์ก; ชิโรเนกิญี่ปุ่น; คิงริชาร์ด; แลนสล็อต; ลินคอล์น; ปันโช; พอร์เบลลา; พอร์โร จิกานเต เด อินแวร์โน; ทาดอร์นา; ไททัน; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Variedade de alho-francês: American Flag; Alho-francês baby; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Shironegi japonês; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Outro
sl-SI: Sorta pora: American Flag; Mladi por; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japonski Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Drugo
es: Variedad de puerro: American Flag; Puerro baby; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elefante; Giant Musselburgh; Shironegi japonés; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Otro
vi: Loại tỏi tây: American Flag; Tỏi tây non; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Shironegi Nhật Bản; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Khác
da: Porresort: American Flag; Baby Leek; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Andet
cs: Odrůda póru: American Flag; Baby pórek; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japonský Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Jiné
de: Auswahl an Porree: American Flag; Baby-Lauch; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elefant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Sonstige
sv: Löksort: American Flag; Babypurjolök; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elefant; Giant Musselburgh; Japansk Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Övrigt
tr: Pırasa çeşidi: American Flag; Bebek Pırasa; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Fil; Giant Musselburgh; Japon Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Diğer
hu: Póréhagyma típusa: American Flag; Bébi póréhagyma; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japán Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Egyéb
ro-RO: Soi de praz: American Flag; Praz baby; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Shironegi japonez; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Altele
ru: Сорт лука-порея: Американский флаг; Мини-лук; Бандит; Блю Солейз; Карантанский; Слоновий; Гигантский Массельбург; Японский широнеги; Кинг Ричард; Ланселот; Линкольн; Панчо; Порбелла; Порро гиганте де инверно; Тадорна; Титан; Другое
en: Leek variety: American Flag; Baby Leek; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Other
nl: Prei variëteit: American Flag; Babyprei; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Overig
bg-BG: Сорт праз: Американско знаме; Бейби праз; Бандит; Блу солей (Blue Solaise); Карентан; Слонски; Гигантски Мюселбург; Японски широнеги; Крал Ричард; Ланселот; Линкълн; Панчо; Порбела; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Тадорна; Титан; Друг
ja: リークの種類: アメリカンフラッグ; ベビーリーキ; バンディット; ブルーソレーズ; カランタン; エレファント; ジャイアントマッセルバーグ; 長ネギ; キングリチャード; ランスロット; リンカーン; パンチョ; ポーベラ; ポロ・ギガンテ・ディ・インヴェルノ; タドルナ; タイタン; その他
hr-HR: Sorta poriluka: American Flag; Mladi poriluk; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Slonovski; Giant Musselburgh; Japanski Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Ostalo
el: Ποικιλία πράσου: American Flag; Baby Leek; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Άλλο
ko: 리크 품종: 아메리칸 플래그; 베이비 리크; 밴딧; 블루 솔레즈; 카랑탕; 엘리펀트; 자이언트 머셀버러; 일본 시로네기; 킹 리처드; 랜슬롯; 링컨; 판초; 포벨라; 뽀로 지간테 디 인베르노; 타도르나; 타이탄; 기타
pt-BR: Alho-poró variedade: American Flag; Alho-poró baby; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Shironegi japonês; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Outro
lt-LT: Porų rūšis: American Flag; Baby Leek; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Kita
nb: Purrevariant: American Flag; Minipurre; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elephant; Giant Musselburgh; Japanese Shironegi; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Annet
zh-CN: 韭菜品种: American Flag; 迷你韭葱; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; 大象韭葱; Giant Musselburgh; 日本白葱; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Porro Gigante de Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; 其他
it: Varietà di porro: American Flag; Baby; Bandit; Blue Solaise; Carentan; Elefante; Gigante di Musselburgh; Shironegi giapponese; King Richard; Lancelot; Lincoln; Pancho; Porbella; Gigante d'Inverno; Tadorna; Titan; Altro